Hawaii statutes.
§671D-4 Definitions. For purposes of
this chapter the following words have the following meanings:

"Adversely affecting" includes
reducing, restricting, suspending, revoking, denying, or failing to renew
clinical privileges or membership in a health care entity.

"Clinical privileges" includes
privileges, membership on the medical staff or panel, and the other
circumstances pertaining to the furnishing of medical care under which a
physician or other licensed health care practitioner is permitted to furnish
such care by a health care entity.

"Director" means the director of the
department of commerce and consumer affairs.

"Health care entity" means:

(1) A hospital that is licensed by the State to
provide health care services;

(2) An entity, including a licensed health
maintenance organization, preferred provider organization, or preferred
provider network, or group medical practice, that is involved in providing
health care services and that follows a formal peer review process for the
purpose of furthering quality health care as may be determined under rules or
guidelines which may be adopted under section 671D-13;

(3) A professional society or committee thereof of
physicians or other licensed health care practitioners that follows a formal
peer review process for the purpose of furthering quality health care as may be
determined under rules or guidelines which may be adopted under section
671D-13;

provided that "health care entity" shall
not include a professional society or committee thereof if, within the previous
five years, the society has been found by the Federal Trade Commission or any
court to have engaged in any anticompetitive practice which had the effect of
restricting the practice of licensed health care practitioners.

"Hospital" means an entity described
in paragraphs (1) and (7) of section 1861(e) of the Social Security Act.

"Licensed health care practitioner"
and "practitioner" mean an individual, other than a physician, who is
licensed or otherwise authorized by the State to provide health care services.

"Physician" means an individual
licensed under chapter 453 or section 463E-1, to practice medicine or surgery
or osteopathy or podiatric medicine; an individual licensed under chapter 448
to practice dentistry or dental surgery; or any individual who, without
authority, holds oneself out to be so authorized.

"Professional review action" means an
action or recommendation of a professional review body which is taken or made
in the conduct of professional review activity, which is based on the
competence or professional conduct of an individual physician which conduct
affects or could affect adversely the health or welfare of a patient or
patients, and adversely affects the clinical privileges, or membership in a
professional society or provider panel, of the physician. This term includes a
formal decision of a professional review body not to take an action or make a
recommendation described in the previous sentence and also includes
professional review activities relating to a professional review action. For
purposes of this chapter an action shall not be considered to be based on the
competence or professional conduct of a physician if the action is primarily
based on any of the following:

(1) The physician's association, or lack of association,
with a professional society or association;

(2) The physician's fees or the physician's
advertising or engaging in other competitive acts intended to solicit or retain
business;

(3) The physician's participation in prepaid group
health plans, salaried employment, or any other manner of delivering health
services whether on a fee-for-service or other basis;

(4) A physician's association with, supervision of,
delegation of authority to, support for, training of, or participation in a
private group practice with, a member or members of a particular class of
health care practitioner or professional; or

(5) Any other matter that does not relate to the
competence or professional conduct of a physician.

"Professional review activity" means
an activity of a health care entity with respect to an individual physician to
do any of the following:

(1) To determine whether the physician may have
clinical privileges with respect to, or membership in, the entity;

(2) To determine the scope or conditions of such
privileges or membership; or

(3) To change or modify such privileges or
membership.

"Professional review body" means a
health care entity and the governing body or any committee of a health care
entity which conducts professional review activity, and includes any committee
of the medical staff of such an entity when assisting the governing body in a
professional review activity. [L 1989, c 354, pt of §3 and c 363, pt of §3; am
L 1997, c 279, §3; am L 2009, c 11, §71]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next